District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.08

Monitoring by Chief of Police.

The Chief of Police shall monitor the MPD personnel’s compliance with MPD orders and protocols related to law enforcement interaction with sexual assault victims, including the Sexual Assault Unit’s Standard Operating Procedures, when responding to sexual assault crimes.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 208, 61 DCR 5913